Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature intends to maintain current law as it relates to individual provider training requirements for individual providers caring only for their family members and repeal the requirement for those individual providers to complete certain training requirements that would otherwise take effect January 1, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) 2024 c 322 s 4;(2) 2024 c 322 s 7 (uncodified); and(3) 2024 c 322 s 8 (uncodified).--- END ---